Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Subpart 2 State Contracts

45-12-130.
State contracts over $5,000.00 voidable without certain approval.

Any contract, contractual obligation, contractual undertaking, contractual arrangement, or agreement by which the state or any of its departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, authorities, or other agencies is obligated to, or may become obligated to, expend more than $5,000.00 shall be voidable by the state unless:

The same is approved by one of the following:

The Department of Administrative Services pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50;

The State Properties Commission created by Articles 2 through 5 of Chapter 16 of Title 50; or

The Office of Planning and Budget, as provided in Code Section 45-12-131; or

The same is exempt, as provided in Code Section 45-12-132.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 910, § 1.

45-12-131.
Office of Planning and Budget to review and approve contracts; exempting of contracts.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall review and, if such contract is authorized by the appropriations Act, approve all contracts provided for by Code Section 45-12-130 and not otherwise approved by the Department of Administrative Services or the State Properties Commission. The Office of Planning and Budget is authorized to exempt, by rule or regulation, certain contracts and classes of contracts, and such exempt contracts shall be binding.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 910, § 2.

45-12-132.
Contracts exempt from subpart.

The following contracts are exempt from this subpart:

Contracts approved by the Department of Transportation, the State Board of Education, the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia, or the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia;

Construction contracts of an authority entered into after competitive bid, including amendments thereto, and emergency contracts of an authority requiring immediate execution and performance for the protection of persons or property; and

Contracts of employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 910, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 603, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 632, § 3/HB 49.